Maryland, session 2026, SB0796.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. HEALTH CARE FINANCING.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS:
(I) A PERSON WHO IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE
AUTHORIZED UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE TO PROVIDE HEALTH
CARE IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS OR PRACTICE OF A PROFESSION OR
IN AN APPROVED EDUCATION OR TRAINING PROGRAM; OR
(II) A VETERINARIAN LICENSED UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 3 OF
THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(2) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” INCLUDES:
(I) AN EMPLOYEE OF A PERSON DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) AN AGENT OF A PERSON DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A HOSPITAL.

SENATE BILL 796 3
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM.
(D) (1) “THIRD–PARTY FINANCING” MEANS FINANCING PROVIDED BY A
PERSON OTHER THAN A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER PROVIDING HEALTH CARE
TREATMENT TO A PATIENT OR THE PATIENT RECEIVING THE HEALTH CARE
TREATMENT IN ORDER TO PAY FOR THE TREATMENT.
(2) “THIRD–PARTY FINANCING” INCLUDES:
(I) AN OPEN END CREDIT PLAN AS DEFINED BY 15 U.S.C. 1602;
(II) A LINE OF CREDIT; AND
(III) A LOAN.
14–5102.
A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL:
(1) BEFORE DISCUSSING THIRD–PARTY FINANCING WITH A PATIENT:
(I) PROVIDE A DISCLOSURE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
OF § 14–5104(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) PROVIDE THE PATIENT WITH A WRITTEN TREATMENT PLAN
THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–5105 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) PROVIDE A PATIENT WITH A FULL REFUND FOR ANY TREATMENT
NOT PROVIDED, IF ANY, WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE PATIENT’S REQUEST FOR THE
REFUND; AND
(3) IF A CREDIT CARD IS USED TO PAY FOR HEALTH CARE SERVICES,
PROVIDE THE PATIENT WITH THE WRITTEN DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER §
14–5104(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5103.
(A) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT:
(1) OBTAIN THIRD–PARTY FINANCING ON BEHALF OF A PATIENT;

SENATE BILL 796
(2) COMPLETE ANY PART OF AN APPLICATION FOR THIRD–PARTY
FINANCING ON BEHALF OF A PATIENT;
(3) PROVIDE A PATIENT OR AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF A PATIENT WITH AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE TO BE USED TO APPLY FOR
THIRD–PARTY FINANCING;
(4) PROMOTE THIRD–PARTY FINANCING TO A PATIENT WHO:
(I) IS UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ANY MIND–ALTERING
SUBSTANCE, INCLUDING ANESTHESIA;
(II) IS ACTIVELY UNDERGOING TREATMENT AT THE TIME OF
THE PROMOTION; OR
(III) IS IN AN AREA WHERE TREATMENT IS PROVIDED UNLESS
THERE IS NO OTHER AREA AT THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER’S OFFICE;
(5) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
OFFER FINANCING, ACCEPT THIRD–PARTY FINANCING, OR CHARGE A HEALTH
CREDIT CARD, IF THE PATIENT’S INSURANCE WILL COVER SERVICES PROVIDED; OR
(6) BILL A THIRD–PARTY FINANCIER MORE THAN 30 DAYS BEFORE
PROVIDING THE HEALTH CARE SERVICES FOR WHICH THE THIRD–PARTY FINANCING
WAS OBTAINED.
(B) IF THE PATIENT’S INSURANCE WILL COVER THE SERVICES PROVIDED, A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY OFFER FINANCING, THIRD–PARTY FINANCING, OR
CHARGE A CREDIT CARD TO PAY FOR A COPAY, COINSURANCE, OR A DEDUCTIBLE.
14–5104.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURE WHEN
DISCUSSING THIRD–PARTY FINANCING WITH A PATIENT:
“CREDIT OR LOAN FOR HEALTH CARE SERVICES
THE ATTACHED APPLICATION AND INFORMATION IS FOR A CREDIT CARD OR
LOAN TO HELP YOU PAY FOR YOUR HEALTH CARE TREATMENT. YOU SHOULD KNOW
THAT:
 YOU ARE APPLYING FOR A _____ CREDIT CARD OR A ____ LOAN FOR $_____.

SENATE BILL 796 5
 YOU DO NOT HAVE TO APPLY FOR THE CREDIT CARD OR LOAN. YOU MAY
REQUEST TO REVIEW, FILL OUT, AND/OR SIGN THE APPLICATION IN A
DIFFERENT LOCATION OR AT A DIFFERENT TIME.
 THIS CREDIT CARD OR LOAN IS NOT THE ONLY WAY YOU MAY PAY FOR YOUR
TREATMENT. YOU MAY PAY YOUR HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IN ANOTHER
MANNER.
 THIS CREDIT CARD OR LOAN IS NOT A PAYMENT PLAN PROVIDED BY YOUR
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER. IT IS CREDIT WITH OR A LOAN MADE BY (NAME OF
COMPANY ISSUING THE CREDIT CARD OR LOAN). YOUR HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER DOES NOT WORK FOR THIS COMPANY.
 BEFORE APPLYING FOR THIS CREDIT CARD OR LOAN, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT
TO A WRITTEN TREATMENT PLAN PROVIDED BY YOUR HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER. THIS TREATMENT PLAN MUST:
o DISCLOSE THE TREATMENT EXPECTED TO BE PROVIDED AND THE
ESTIMATED COSTS OF EACH SERVICE INCLUDED;
o DISCLOSE HOW MUCH OF THE COST YOUR INSURANCE IS EXPECTED TO
COVER, IF YOU HAVE INSURANCE; AND
o DISCLOSE WHETHER MARYLAND MEDICAID WILL COVER AN
ALTERNATIVE TREATMENT OPTION, IF YOU HAVE MARYLAND
MEDICAID.
 IF YOU PREFER TO SOLELY USE SERVICES COVERED BY MARYLAND
MEDICAID, YOU SHOULD NOT APPLY FOR THIS CREDIT CARD OR LOAN.
 YOUR HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT CHARGE THE CREDIT CARD OR LOAN
ACCOUNT YOU ARE APPLYING FOR UNTIL 30 DAYS BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF
YOUR TREATMENT.
 YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO CANCEL THIS CREDIT CARD OR LOAN BEFORE THE
TREATMENT IS PROVIDED, WITHOUT PENALTY.
 YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO HAVE YOUR CREDIT CARD OR LOAN ACCOUNT
REFUNDED FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF ANY CHARGES FOR TREATMENT THAT
YOU DID NOT RECEIVE.
 YOUR HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IS REQUIRED TO REFUND THE FULL AMOUNT
OF ANY CHARGES FOR TREATMENT THAT YOU DID NOT RECEIVE WITHIN 15
DAYS AFTER YOUR REQUEST FOR THE REFUND.
 YOUR LENDER IS REQUIRED TO CREDIT ANY REFUND PROVIDED AGAINST
YOUR CREDIT CARD BALANCE OR LOAN BALANCE.
 YOU MAY BE REQUIRED TO PAY INTEREST ON THE AMOUNT CHARGED TO THE
CREDIT CARD, OR ON THE AMOUNT OF THE LOAN.
 YOUR LENDER MAY PROVIDE A PROMOTIONAL PERIOD, DURING WHICH YOU
MAY PAY BACK THE CREDIT CARD BALANCE OR LOAN BALANCE WITHOUT
INTEREST. AFTER ANY PROMOTIONAL PERIOD ENDS, YOU MAY BE CHARGED
INTEREST ON PORTIONS OF THE BALANCE THAT HAVE ALREADY BEEN PAID.
 IF YOU PAY LATE OR FAIL TO MAKE PAYMENT:
o YOU MAY HAVE TO PAY A PENALTY AND/OR A HIGHER INTEREST RATE;

SENATE BILL 796
o YOUR LATE OR MISSED PAYMENTS MAY BE REPORTED TO CREDIT
BUREAUS AND MAY HURT YOUR CREDIT RATING; AND
o YOU MAY BE SUED.
 YOU MAY USE THIS CREDIT CARD OR LOAN TO PAY FOR FUTURE HEALTH
SERVICES.
 IF YOUR HEALTH CARE PROVIDER COMPLETED OR SUBMITTED AN
APPLICATION FOR A CREDIT CARD OR LOAN ON YOUR BEHALF, YOU MAY FILE
A COMPLAINT BY CONTACTING THE CONSUMER PROTECTION DIVISION OF
THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ONLINE AT (INSERT
WEBSITE ADDRESS FOR THE DIVISION) OR BY CALLING (INSERT PHONE
NUMBER FOR THE DIVISION AND RELATED TOLL–FREE NUMBER).
PLEASE READ THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THIS CREDIT CARD OR LOAN.”
(2) A PATIENT WHO ELECTS TO APPLY FOR THIRD–PARTY FINANCING
SHALL SIGN THE DISCLOSURE PROVIDED BY THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER AS
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE A PATIENT WHO
ELECTS TO APPLY FOR THIRD–PARTY FINANCING WITH A COPY OF THE SIGNED
DISCLOSURE.
(4) THE SIGNED COPY OF THE DISCLOSURE PROVIDED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE DIGITAL.
(B) (1) THE DIVISION SHALL PREPARE A DISCLOSURE FORM THAT
INCLUDES:
(I) AN ADVISEMENT THAT HEALTH CARE BILLS PAID FOR WITH
A CREDIT CARD ARE NOT CONSIDERED HEALTH CARE DEBT; AND
(II) AN ADVISEMENT AS TO ANY FEDERAL OR STATE
PROTECTIONS THAT APPLY TO HEALTH CARE DEBT THAT THE PATIENT WOULD BE
GIVING UP BY PAYING A HEALTH CARE BILL WITH A CREDIT CARD, INCLUDING THAT
THE PAYMENT:
1. IS NOT SUBJECT TO PROHIBITIONS AGAINST WAGE
GARNISHMENT OR PROPERTY LIENS THAT APPLY TO HEALTH CARE DEBT; AND
2. IS NOT SUBJECT TO LIMITATIONS ON INTEREST
RATES THAT APPLY TO HEALTH CARE DEBT.

SENATE BILL 796 7
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL PUBLISH THE DISCLOSURE FORM
PREPARED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON ITS WEBSITE IN
ENGLISH AND IN ANY OTHER LANGUAGE DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE
DIVISION.
(C) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE THE DISCLOSURES
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) IN AT LEAST 14 POINT FONT; AND
(2) (I) IF PROVIDED BY THE DIVISION, IN THE PRIMARY LANGUAGE
OF THE PATIENT; AND
(II) IF THE PRIMARY LANGUAGE OF THE PATIENT IS NOT
AVAILABLE, IN ENGLISH.
(D) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE THE
DISCLOSURE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IF THE THIRD–PARTY
FINANCING IS SOLELY MENTIONED AS A PAYMENT OPTION.
14–5105.
A TREATMENT PLAN PROVIDED UNDER § 14–5102(A)(1)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL:
(1) LIST EACH SERVICE ANTICIPATED TO BE PROVIDED AND THE
ESTIMATED COST OF EACH SERVICE;
(2) PROVIDE AN ESTIMATE OF THE SHARE OF EACH COST THAT THE
PATIENT WILL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYING;
(3) INDICATE WHETHER THE PROGRAM COVERS AN ALTERNATIVE
SERVICE THAT IS COVERED BY THE PROGRAM IF THE PATIENT IS COVERED BY THE
PROGRAM AND THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER ACCEPTS THE PATIENT’S COVERAGE;
(4) INDICATE THAT A PATIENT WHO IS COVERED BY THE PROGRAM
HAS THE RIGHT TO REQUEST THAT ONLY SERVICES COVERED BY THE PROGRAM BE
PROVIDED;
(5) INDICATE THAT THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IS REQUIRED TO
FOLLOW THE RULES OF THE PROGRAM AND TO PROVIDE ONLY SERVICES COVERED
BY THE PROGRAM;

SENATE BILL 796
(6) INDICATE THAT ANY SERVICES NOT COVERED BY THE PATIENT’S
INSURANCE PLAN ARE NOT COVERED; AND
(7) INDICATE THAT THE PATIENT HAS THE RIGHT TO CONFIRM ANY
HEALTH CARE BENEFIT OR INSURANCE INFORMATION BEFORE BEGINNING
TREATMENT.
14–5106.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5107.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE PENALTY AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.